Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-751
Ground Water Management Fund; created; use; investment.

All fees paid to the Chief Water Officer pursuant to the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Ground Water Management Fund which is hereby created and which shall be administered by the Chief Water Officer. Any money credited to the fund may be utilized by the Chief Water Officer for payments of expenses incurred in the administration of the act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1975, LB 577, § 15;

Laws 1984, LB 1071, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 42;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 46-670;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 39;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 200;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 46-656.33;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 91;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 244.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.